Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20173-201.01
Temporary airports and landing fields; approval; application; purpose of landing area.

Any proposed airport, restricted landing area, or other air navigation facility which will be in existence for less than thirty consecutive days shall first be approved by the Division of Aeronautics of the Department of Transportation before any such airport, landing area, or other facility shall be used or operated. Any municipality or person proposing the use of property for such purpose shall first make application for a temporary permit for the site selected and the general purpose or purposes for which the property will be used, to insure that the property and its use shall conform to minimum standards of safety and shall serve the public interest. Designation of the location and approval of sites for the proposed temporary airports, restricted landing areas, and other air navigation facilities as provided in section 3-104 may be delegated to the division by the Nebraska Aeronautics Commission. The provisions of this section shall not apply to restricted landing areas designated for personal use pursuant to section 3-136.

Laws 1976, LB 460, § 8;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 56.
July 1, 2017